Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:(1) An advisory committee to advance the economic development of quantum technologies is established with members as provided in this section.(a) The lieutenant governor or designee;(b) One statewide elected official;(c) The director or designee;(d) One or more representatives from an institution of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016;(e) Two representatives from technology companies with headquarters in the state;(f) One representative from an aerospace company with a factory in the state;(g) One representative from a company that builds and sells quantum computers and software; and(h) One representative from the Pacific Northwest national laboratory.(2) The members of the advisory committee shall be appointed by the director.(3) The department must provide direction and ensure accountability for the advisory committee through its information technology sector lead within the office of economic development and competitiveness.(4) The department must provide staff for the advisory committee.(5) The advisory committee must:(a) Select a chair from among its membership;(b) Meet at least quarterly, with the initial meeting no later than August 1, 2025;(c) Produce an annual report to the legislature with recommendations to competitively promote a quantum technology ecosystem in the state; and(d) Produce a workforce development plan.(6) This section expires June 30, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.330 RCW to read as follows:(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department, through its office of economic development and competitiveness, shall establish a grant program to support applicants for federal grants related to quantum technology.(2) The department must partner with an institution of higher education, as defined in RCW 28B.10.016, with a research program in quantum technology.(3) The department may consult with technology companies, the northwest quantum nexus coalition, companies that build and sell quantum computers and software, or the Pacific Northwest national laboratory to identify relevant federal grants for the state's economic development.(4) The department must award grants on at least an annual basis.(5) Eligible applicants must apply for the grant program in a manner to be determined by the department.(6) The department may adopt rules to implement this section.--- END ---